California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 checks, preenrollment inspections, or unannounced visits, shall be granted provisional provider status effective on January 1, 2004. Applications from applicants or providers who have been so noticed prior to January 1, 2004, shall be processed in accordance with subdivision (h) of Section 14043.26.

(2) Applications from applicants or providers that have been received by the department after May 1, 2003, but prior to January 1, 2004, shall be processed in accordance with Section 14043.26, except that these application packages shall be deemed to have been received by the department on January 1, 2004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 298, Sec. 27.   (AB 1540)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.3.

A provider shall be required to reimburse those Medi-Cal funds received during any period for which material information was not reported, or reported falsely, to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 146, Sec. 37.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.34.

(a) As a condition of a pharmacy’s participation in the Medi-Cal program, the pharmacy shall have in stock and regularly dispense prescription drugs.

(b) For purposes of this section, “prescription drugs” means any drug unsafe for self use by a person, and includes either of the following:

(1) Any drug that bears the legend: “Rx Only” or “Caution: federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription”
 or words of similar import.

(2) Any other drug that by federal or state law can be lawfully dispensed by the prescription of a licensed physician and surgeon.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 322, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.341.

(a) Each provider that dispenses, as defined in Section 4024 of the Business and Professions Code, or that furnishes, as defined in Section 4026 of the Business and Professions Code, a controlled drug, a dangerous drug, or a dangerous device to a Medi-Cal beneficiary, or a drug or device requiring a written order or prescription for the drug or device to be covered under the Medi-Cal program, or who obtains a biological specimen from a Medi-Cal beneficiary for the performance of a clinical laboratory test or examination shall maintain a
 record of the signature of the person receiving the drug or device or from whom a biological specimen was obtained; the printed name of the recipient or person from whom the biological specimen was obtained; the date signed; for a drug or device, the prescription number or a description of the item or items dispensed or furnished; and if the recipient is not the beneficiary for whom the drug or device was ordered or prescribed or from whom a biological specimen was obtained, a notation of the recipient’s relationship to that beneficiary. The signature and printed name of the person from whom a biological specimen is obtained on the requisition provided to the clinical laboratory for performance of the test or examination for which the specimen was obtained shall be sufficient to comply with this section if a copy of the signed requisition is kept by the provider obtaining the biological specimen. Furthermore, no signature is required under this section where the biological specimen is obtained for the
 purpose of anatomical pathology examinations performed during the inpatient or outpatient surgery if a notation of the performance of the anatomical pathology examination appears in the medical record.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Biological specimen” shall have the same meaning as in Section 1206 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) “Clinical laboratory test or examination” shall have the same meaning as in Section 1206 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) “Controlled substance” shall mean any substance listed in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11053) of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) “Dangerous drug” or “dangerous device” has the same meaning as in
 Section 4022 of the Business and Professions Code.

(5) “Drug or device” means:

(A) “Drug,” as defined in Section 4025 of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) “Device,” as defined in Section 4023 of the Business and Professions Code.

(C) Pharmaceuticals, medical equipment, medical supplies, orthotics and prosthetics appliances, and other product-like supplies or equipment.

(c) Nothing in this section shall require a provider who dispenses or furnishes a complimentary sample of a dangerous drug to maintain the signature of the person receiving that drug, provided no charge is made to the patient, and an appropriate record is entered in the patient’s chart.

(d) If the dispensing or furnishing of a drug or device occurs on a periodic basis within an established provider-patient relationship, the signature shall only be required upon the initial dispensing or furnishing of the drug, so long as an appropriate record of each dispensing or furnishing is entered in the patient’s chart.

(e) If the obtaining of a biological specimen is required in order that a test or examination occur on a periodic basis within an established provider-patient relationship, the signature shall only be required upon obtaining the biological specimen necessary for the initial test or examination so long as an appropriate record of each test or examination is entered in the patient’s chart.

(f) The requirement of this section to obtain a signature shall not apply to a licensed pharmacy or clinical
 laboratory that is owned and operated by a nonprofit health care service plan that has at least 3,500,000 enrollees or that is owned and operated by a nonprofit hospital corporation that has a mutually exclusive contract with a nonprofit health care service plan that has at least 3,500,000 enrollees, or to a licensed provider who practices within a physician organization that meets either of the requirements set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1375.4 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 601, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.35.

Sections 14043.2, 14043.25, and 14043.3 shall not limit the authority granted the director and the rights granted providers in Section 14123. Action taken under the authority granted in Section 14123 shall be taken in accordance with that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 146, Sec. 37.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.36.

(a) The department shall not enroll any applicant that has been convicted of any felony or misdemeanor involving fraud or abuse in any government program, or related to neglect or abuse of a patient in connection with the delivery of a health care item or service, or in connection with the interference with or obstruction of any investigation into health care related fraud or abuse or that has been found liable for fraud or abuse in any civil proceeding, or that has entered into a settlement in lieu of conviction for fraud or abuse in any government program, within the previous 10 years. In addition, the department may deny enrollment to any applicant that, at the time of application, is under investigation by the department or any state, local, or federal government law enforcement agency for fraud or abuse pursuant to
 Subpart A (commencing with Section 455.12) of Part 455 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The department shall not deny enrollment to an otherwise qualified applicant whose felony or misdemeanor charges did not result in a conviction solely on the basis of the prior charges. If it is discovered that a provider is under investigation by the department or any state, local, or federal government agency for fraud or abuse, including any local, state, or federal program, at the department’s discretion, that provider shall be subject to temporary suspension from the Medi-Cal program, which shall include temporary deactivation of the provider’s number, including all business addresses used by the provider to obtain reimbursement from the Medi-Cal program.

(b) If it is discovered that a provider has been terminated under Medicare or under the Medicaid program or Children’s Health Insurance Program in any other state, the provider shall not be enrolled in, or shall be subject to termination from, the Medi-Cal program, which shall include deactivation of the provider’s enrolled numbers and all business addresses used to obtain reimbursement from the Medi-Cal program.

(c) The director shall notify in writing the provider, by certified mail, of the temporary suspension and deactivation of the provider’s number, which shall take effect
 on the date the department sends the notification. If the provider has an email address on file with the department, the department shall notify the provider by certified mail and by email, and the temporary suspension and deactivation of the provider’s number shall take effect on the date the department sends the notification to the provider’s email address on file with the department. Notwithstanding Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code, proceedings after the imposition of sanctions provided for in subdivision (a) shall be in accordance with Section 14043.65.

(d) A temporary suspension may be lifted when a resolution of an investigation for fraud or abuse occurs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 252, Sec. 23.   (AB 173)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.37.

The department may complete a background check on applicants for the purpose of verifying the accuracy of the information provided to the department for purposes of enrolling in the Medi-Cal program and in order to prevent fraud and abuse. The background check may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) Onsite inspection prior to enrollment.

(b) Review of business records.

(c) Data searches.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 322, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.38.

(a) Provider types are designated as “limited,” “moderate,” or “high” categorical risk by the federal government in Section 424.518 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The department shall, at minimum, utilize the federal regulations in determining a provider’s or applicant’s categorical risk.

(b) In accordance with Section 455.450 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the department shall designate a provider or applicant as a “high” categorical risk if any of the following occur:

(1) The department imposes a payment suspension based on a credible allegation of fraud, waste, or abuse.

(2) The provider or applicant has an existing Medicaid overpayment based on fraud, waste, or abuse.

(3) The provider or applicant has been excluded by the federal Office of the Inspector General or another state’s Medicaid program within the previous 10 years.

(4) The department or the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services lifted a temporary moratorium within the previous six months for the particular provider type submitting the application, the applicant would have been prevented from enrolling based on that previous moratorium, and the applicant applies for enrollment as a provider at any time within six months from the date the moratorium was lifted.

(c) If the department designates a provider or applicant as a “high” categorical risk, the department or the State Department of Public Health shall require the provider or applicant to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check by doing both of the following:

(1) Conduct a criminal background check of the following persons:

(A) The provider or applicant. If the provider or applicant is a nonprofit Drug Medi-Cal provider or applicant, the officers and executive director of the provider or applicant.

(B) Any person with a 5-percent or greater direct or indirect ownership interest in the provider or applicant.

(2) Require the following persons to submit a set of fingerprints within 30 days of the department’s or the State Department of Public Health’s request in a manner determined by the department or the State Department of Public Health:

(A) The provider or applicant. If the provider or applicant is a nonprofit Drug Medi-Cal provider or applicant, the officers and executive director of the provider or applicant.

(B) Any person with a 5-percent or greater direct or indirect ownership interest in the provider or applicant.

(d) (1) The department or the State Department of Public Health shall require the applicant or provider to submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related
 information required by the Department of Justice for an individual specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) who is subject to a state and national criminal history background check pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(2) The Department of Justice shall provide a state- or federal-level response to the department pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(3) The department or the State Department of Public Health shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for persons described in paragraph (1).

(4) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover
 the cost of processing the request described in this section. That fee shall be paid by the subject of the criminal background check.

(e) For persons subject to the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 15660, the procedure for obtaining and submitting fingerprints and notification by the Department of Justice of criminal record information set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 15660 shall apply instead of the procedure set forth in subdivision (d).

(f) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Applicant” means an individual, including an ordering, referring, or prescribing individual, entity, or person with ownership or control interest in the applicant entity, managing employee,
 or agent that applies for enrollment as a provider in the Medi-Cal program that is subject to federal screening level requirements under Sections 424.518 and 455.450 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) “Person with ownership or control interest,” “managing employee,” and “agent” have the same meanings as defined in Section 455.101 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) “Provider” means an individual, entity, person with ownership or control interest in the entity, managing employee, or agent that is enrolled in the Medi-Cal program that furnishes, directly or indirectly, including all ordering, referring, and prescribing, any service, good, supply, or merchandise to a Medi-Cal beneficiary whose enrollment is subject to federal screening level
 requirements under Sections 424.518 and 455.450 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 28.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.4.

If discrepancies are found to exist during the preenrollment period, the department may conduct additional inspections prior to enrollment. Failure of a provider to remediate discrepancies as prescribed by the director may result in denial of the application for enrollment. The department may deactivate all of the provider’s business addresses if the department determines that the discrepancies are material to the provider’s continued enrollment and the provider’s compliance with program requirements at the additional business addresses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 271, Sec. 7.   (SB 299)   Effective September 4, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.45.

(a) Notwithstanding whether a National Provider Identification (NPI) number is required by the rules issued by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services implementing the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA), the department may require that an applicant or provider submit an NPI number.

(b) For transactions not specifically identified as covered transactions under the HIPAA NPI rules, the department may require that a provider use a National
 Provider Identification number on those transactions, or the department may issue the provider a unique identification number or numbers that shall be used on all transactions.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the department may, without taking regulatory action pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of a provider bulletin or similar instruction. The department shall notify and consult with interested parties and appropriate stakeholders in implementing, interpreting, or making specific this statute, including taking all of the following actions:

(1) Notifying provider representatives of the proposed action or change. The notice shall occur at least 10 business days prior to the meeting provided for in paragraph (2).

(2) Scheduling at least one meeting with interested parties and appropriate stakeholders to discuss the action or change.

(3) Allowing for written input regarding the action or change.

(4) Providing at least 30 days’ advance notice of the effective date of the action or change.

(d) This section shall apply to any health care program administered by the department or its agents or contractors.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 45.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.46.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on the effective date of the act adding this section, the department may implement a one-year moratorium on the certification and enrollment into the Medi-Cal program of new adult day health care centers on a statewide basis or within a geographic area.

(b) The moratorium shall not apply to the following:

(1) Programs of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE)
 established pursuant to Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14590).

(2) An organization that currently holds a designation as a federally qualified health center as defined in Section 1396d(l)(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) An organization that currently holds a designation as a federally qualified rural health clinic as defined in Section 1396d(l)(1) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(4) An applicant with the physical location of the center in an unserved area, which is defined as a county having no licensed and certified adult day health care center within its geographic boundary.

(5) Commencing May 1, 2006, an applicant for certification that meets all of the following:

(A) Is serving persons discharged into community housing from a nursing facility operated by the City and County of San Francisco.

(B) Has submitted, after December 31, 2005, but prior to February 1, 2006, an application for certification that has not been denied.

(C) Meets all criteria for certification imposed under this article and is licensed as an adult day health care center pursuant to Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 1570) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(6) An applicant that is requesting expansion or relocation, or both, that has been Medi-Cal certified as an adult day health care center for at least four years, is expanding or relocating within the same county, and that meets one of the following population-based criteria as reported in the California Long Term Care County
 Data Book, 2002:

(A) The county is ranked number one or two for having the highest ratio of persons over 65 years of age receiving Medi-Cal benefits.

(B) The county is ranked number one or two for having the highest ratio of persons over 85 years of age residing in the county.

(C) The county is ranked number one or two for having the greatest ratio of persons over 65 years of age living in poverty.

(7) An applicant for certification that is currently licensed and located in a county with a population that exceeds 9,000,000 and meets the following criteria:

(A) The applicant has identified a special population of regional center consumers whose individual program plan calls for the
 specialized health and social services that are uniquely provided within the adult day health care center, in order to prevent deterioration of the special population’s health status.

(B) The referring regional center submits a letter to the Director of Health Services supporting the applicant for certification as an adult day health care provider for this special population.

(C) The applicant is currently providing services to the special population as a vendor of the referring regional center.

(D) The participants in the center are clients of the referring regional center and are not residing in a health facility licensed pursuant to subdivision (c), (d), (g), (h), or (k) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) The moratorium shall not
 prohibit the department from approving a change of ownership, relocation, or increase in capacity for an adult day health care center if the following conditions are met:

(1) For an application to change ownership, the adult day health care center meets all of the following conditions:

(A) Has been licensed and certified prior to the effective date of this section.

(B) Has a license in good standing.

(C) Has a record of substantial compliance with certification laws and regulations.

(D) Has met all requirements for the change application.

(2) For an application to relocate an existing facility, the relocation center must meet
 all of the conditions of paragraph (1) and both of the following conditions:

(A) Must be located in the same county as the existing licensed center.

(B) Must be licensed for the same capacity as the existing licensed center, unless the relocation center is located in an underserved area, which is defined as a county having 2 percent or fewer Medi-Cal beneficiaries over the age of 65 years using adult day health care services, based on 2002 calendar year Medi-Cal utilization data.

(3) For an application to increase the capacity of an existing facility, the center must meet all of the conditions of paragraph (1) and must be located in an underserved area, which is defined as a county having 2 percent or fewer Medi-Cal beneficiaries over the age of 65 years using adult day health care services, based on 2002 calendar
 year Medi-Cal utilization data.

(d) Following the first 180 days of the moratorium period, the department may make exceptions to the moratorium for new adult day health care centers that are located in underserved areas if the center’s application was on file with the department on or before the effective date of the act adding this section. In order to apply for this exemption, an applicant or licensee must meet all of the following criteria:

(1) The applicant has control of a facility, either by ownership or lease agreement, that will house the adult day health care center, has provided to the department all necessary documents and fees, and has completed and submitted all required fingerprinting forms to the department.

(2) The physical location of the applicant’s or licensee’s adult day health care center is in
 an underserved area, which is defined as a county having 2 percent or fewer Medi-Cal beneficiaries over the age of 65 years using adult day health care services, based on 2002 calendar year Medi-Cal utilization data.

(e) During the period of the moratorium, a licensee or applicant that meets the criteria for an exemption as defined in subdivision (d) may submit a written request for an exemption to the director.

(f) If the director determines that a new adult day health care licensee or applicant meets the exemption criteria, the director may certify the licensee or applicant, once licensed, for participation in the Medi-Cal program.

(g) The director may extend this moratorium, if necessary, to coincide with the implementation date of the adult day health care waiver.

(h) The authority granted in this section shall not be interpreted as a limitation on the authority granted to the department in any other section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 46.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.47.

(a) A provider doing business as a sole proprietorship, partnership, or professional corporation under Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of the Corporations Code or a rendering physician provider in a group who utilizes nonphysician medical practitioners to provide services, goods, supplies, or merchandise to Medi-Cal beneficiaries shall meet the specific supervisory requirements applicable to such providers, pursuant to the Business and Professions Code or other state or federal law.

(b) A provider doing business as a sole proprietorship, partnership, or professional corporation under Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of the Corporations Code or a rendering physician provider in a group who fails to comply with the requirements of this section is subject to temporary suspension from the Medi-Cal program and deactivation of the provider’s number, including all business addresses.

(c) A physician doing business as a sole proprietorship, partnership, or professional corporation under Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of the Corporations Code or a rendering physician provider in a group may not be enrolled at more than three business addresses unless there is a ratio of at least one physician providing supervision for every three locations.

(d) A physician doing
 business as a sole proprietorship, partnership, or professional medical corporation under Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of the Corporations Code or a rendering physician provider in a group who fails to comply with the requirements of this section is subject to temporary suspension from the Medi-Cal program and deactivation of all of his or her number, including all business addresses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 47.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.5.

Subject to Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may enter into contracts to secure consultant services or information technology including, but not limited to, software, data, or analytical techniques or methodologies for the purpose of fraud or abuse detection and prevention. Contracts under this section shall be exempt from the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 146, Sec. 37.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.51.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Department” means the State Department of Health Care Services.

(2) “Electronic visit verification system” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subsection (l) of Section 1396b of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) “Partners” means governmental entities, including, but not limited to, the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Developmental Services, the State Department of Public Health, the California Department of Aging, and the Office of Technology and Solutions Integration.

(4) “Provider” means a provider who is enrolled in the Medi-Cal program, as specified in subdivision (h) of Section 14043.1.

(b) The department, as the single state agency for the Medicaid program in California, may undertake action, as determined by the director to be appropriate, to implement an electronic visit verification system for purposes of obtaining and maintaining federal approval or ensuring federal financial participation is available or not otherwise jeopardized.

(c) The department may collaborate and contract with other governmental entities, including its partners, to comply with federal
 requirements relating to electronic visit verification.

(d) (1) If a provider renders Medi-Cal services that are subject to electronic visit verification, they shall comply with requirements, as established by the department and its partners, relating to electronic verification of those services.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), if the department determines a provider has failed to comply with the established requirements, the department and its partners, as may be appropriate under the circumstances, may take any of the following action to address the noncompliance of the provider:

(A) Provide technical assistance on compliance.

(B) Require an approved corrective action plan.

(C) Recover associated overpayments.

(D) Impose enrollment or monetary sanctions.

(E) Take any other remedial action, as deemed appropriate.

(3) Individual providers of in-home supportive services, and individual providers of waiver personal care services, who are not employed by an agency, are not subject to the actions described in paragraph (2) for purposes of noncompliance with requirements established pursuant to paragraph (1), and are instead subject to the electronic visit verification system development and implementation principles set forth in Section 10836 and the provisions of Sections 12305.82 and 12305.83.

(e) (1) The department and its partners may enter into
 exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis to implement this section and an electronic visit verification system.

(2) In developing and implementing electronic visit verification, the department and its partners may continue to utilize services performed under existing contracts if those services involve planning, developing, or establishing an electronic visit verification protocol or system.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department and its partners may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletins, plan letters, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 68.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.55.

(a) The department may implement a 180-day moratorium on the enrollment of providers in a specific provider of service category, on a statewide basis or within a geographic area, when the director determines this action is
 necessary to safeguard public funds or to maintain the fiscal integrity of the program. The department shall provide written notice to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee at least 10 calendar days prior to the effective date of the initiation of a moratorium implemented under this subdivision. The department shall provide a new notification every 180 days that a moratorium is in effect. These written notices shall include the rationale for the moratorium or extension of an existing moratorium, as applicable, affected provider categories, and geographic scope. This moratorium may be extended or repeated when the director determines this action is necessary to safeguard public funds or to maintain the fiscal integrity of the program. The authority granted in this section shall not be interpreted as a limitation on the authority granted to the department in Section 14105.3.

(b) If the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services establishes a temporary moratorium on enrollment as described in federal regulations, the department shall establish a corresponding moratorium covering the same period and provider types, even if those provider types would not ordinarily be subject to a moratorium under this section, unless the department determines that the imposition of the moratorium will adversely impact beneficiaries access to medical assistance. A federal moratorium adopted under this subdivision shall not be subject to the director’s determinations regarding safeguards of public funds and program integrity or other prerequisites that are necessary to implement a state-initiated moratorium.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 252, Sec. 24.   (AB 173)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.6.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the department shall automatically suspend, as a provider in the Medi-Cal program, any individual who, or any entity that, has a license, certificate, or other approval to provide health care, which is revoked or suspended by a federal, California, or another state’s licensing, certification, or approval authority, has otherwise lost that license, certificate, or approval, or has surrendered that license, certificate, or approval while a disciplinary hearing on that license, certificate, or approval was pending. The automatic suspension shall be effective on the date that the license, certificate, or approval was revoked, lost, or surrendered.

(b) The department may elect to not suspend an individual or entity as a provider in the Medi-Cal program pursuant to subdivision (a) if the revocation, suspension, or loss of the individual or entity’s license, certification, or approval authority in another state or the pending disciplinary hearing during which the individual or entity surrendered the license, certification, or approval authority in another state is based solely on conduct that is not deemed to be unprofessional conduct under California law. The department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary to implement this subdivision. This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent that the department obtains any necessary federal approvals and federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific subdivision (b), in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or similar written instructions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 261, Sec. 4.   (SB 487)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.61.

(a) A provider shall be subject to suspension if claims for payment are submitted for the services, goods, supplies, or merchandise provided, directly or indirectly, to a Medi-Cal beneficiary, by an individual or entity that is suspended, excluded, or otherwise ineligible because of a sanction to receive, directly or indirectly, reimbursement from the Medi-Cal program and the individual or entity is listed on either the Suspended and Ineligible Provider List, published by the department, to identify suspended and otherwise ineligible
 providers, or any list published by the federal Office of Inspector General regarding the suspension or exclusion of individuals or entities from the federal Medicare and medicaid programs, to identify suspended, excluded, or otherwise ineligible providers.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code, the imposition of the sanction provided for in subdivision (a) shall be appealable in accordance with Section 14043.65.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 48.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.62.

(a) The department shall deactivate, immediately and without prior notice, the provider’s number, including all business addresses used by a provider to obtain reimbursement from the Medi-Cal program when warrants or documents mailed to a provider’s mailing address or its pay to address, if any, or its service or business address, are returned by the United States Postal Service as not deliverable or when a provider has not submitted a claim for reimbursement from the Medi-Cal program for one year. Prior to taking this action the
 department shall use due diligence in attempting to contact the provider at its last known telephone number and ascertain if the return by the United States Postal Service is by mistake or shall use due diligence in attempting to contact the provider by telephone or in writing to ascertain whether the provider wishes to continue to participate in the Medi-Cal program. If deactivation pursuant to this section occurs, the provider shall meet the requirements for reapplication as specified in this article or the regulations adopted thereunder.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Mailing address” means the address that the provider has identified to the department in its application for enrollment as the address at which it wishes to receive general program correspondence.

(2) “Pay to address” means the address that
 the provider has identified to the department in its application for enrollment as the address at which it wishes to receive warrants.

(3) “Service or business address” means the address that the provider has identified to the department in its application for enrollment as the address at which the provider will provide services to program beneficiaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 49.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14043.65.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, any applicant whose application for enrollment as a provider or whose certification is denied; or any provider who is denied continued enrollment or certification, or denied enrollment for a new location, who has been temporarily suspended, who has had payments suspended, who has had one or more business addresses used to obtain reimbursement from the Medi-Cal program
 deactivated, or whose provisional provider status or preferred provisional provider status has been terminated pursuant to this article or Section 14107.11, or Section 100185.5 of the Health and Safety Code, or who has had a civil penalty imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14123.25; or any billing agent, as defined in Section 14040, when the billing agent’s registration has been denied pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 14040.5, may appeal this action by submitting a written appeal, including any supporting evidence, to the director or the director’s designee. If the appeal is of a suspension of payment pursuant to Section 14107.11, the appeal to the director or the director’s designee shall be limited to the credibility of the allegation supporting the payment suspension, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 14107.11, and shall not encompass investigation or adjudication of the allegation. The appeal procedure shall not include a formal administrative hearing under the Administrative